Nebraska, session 109, LB101.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB101 LB101
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 76-1415, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-1415 (1) No rental agreement may provide that the tenant:
(a) Agrees to waive or to forego rights or remedies under the
Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act or other federal or state
law;
(b) Authorizes any person to confess judgment on a claim arising out
of the rental agreement;
(c) Agrees to pay the landlord's or tenant's attorney's fees; or
(d) Agrees to the exculpation or limitation of any liability of the
landlord arising due to active and actionable negligence of the landlord
or to indemnify the landlord for that liability arising due to active and
actionable negligence or the costs connected therewith.
(2) A provision prohibited by subsection (1) of this section
included in a rental agreement is unenforceable. If a landlord
deliberately uses a rental agreement containing provisions known by him
or her to be prohibited, the tenant may recover actual damages sustained
by him or her and reasonable attorney's fees.
Sec. 2. Section 76-1441, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
76-1441 (1) The person seeking possession shall file a complaint for
restitution with the clerk of the district or county court. The complaint
shall contain (a) the specific statutory authority under which possession
is sought; (b) the facts, with particularity, on which he or she seeks to
recover; (c) a reasonably accurate description of the premises; and (d)
the requisite compliance with the notice provisions of the Uniform
Residential Landlord and Tenant Act. The complaint may notify the tenant
that personal property remains on the premises and that it may be
disposed of pursuant to section 69-2308 or subsection (5) of section
76-1414. The complaint may contain a demand for a trial by jury. The
complaint may also contain other causes of action relating to the
-2-

LB101 LB101
2025 2025
tenancy, but such causes of action shall be answered and tried
separately, if requested by either party in writing.
(2) The person seeking possession pursuant to subsection (4) of
section 76-1431 shall include in the complaint the incident or incidents
giving rise to the suit for recovery of possession.
Sec. 3. Section 76-1442, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-1442 The summons shall be issued and directed, with a copy of the
complaint attached thereto, and shall state the cause of the complaint,
the time and place of trial of the action for possession, answer day for
other causes of action, and notice that if the defendant fails to appear
judgment shall be entered against him or her, and notice that the
defendant has a right to a trial by jury and that the defendant may
demand a trial by jury if he or she so chooses. The summons may be served
and returned as in other cases or by any person, except that the summons
shall be served within three days, excluding nonjudicial days, from the
date of issuance and shall be returnable within five days, excluding
nonjudicial days, from the date of issuance. The person making the
service shall file with the court an affidavit stating with particularity
the manner in which he or she made the service. If diligent efforts have
been made to serve the summons in the manner provided in sections
25-505.01 to 25-516.01 but such efforts were unsuccessful, the summons
may be served in the manner provided in section 76-1442.01.
Sec. 4. Section 76-1445, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-1445 On or before the day fixed for his or her appearance, the
defendant may appear and answer and assert any legal or equitable
defense, setoff, or counterclaim and may demand a trial by jury. If the
defendant has not demanded a trial by jury by the time of his or her
first appearance, the court shall inform the defendant of the right to a
trial by jury and, if the action is filed in county court, shall inquire
-3-

LB101 LB101
2025 2025
whether the defendant demands a trial by jury or elects to have the
action tried by the court without a jury.
Sec. 5. Section 76-1446, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-1446 (1) The proceedings shall be in all respects as in other
cases, except that:
(a) If the action for possession will be tried by the court without
a jury, the trial shall be held not less than ten nor more than fourteen
days after the issuance of the summons; or
(b) If the action for possession will be tried by a jury, the trial
shall be scheduled by the court as soon as is practicable for the proper
administration of justice. If, at the request of the tenant, the jury
trial is continued beyond the initial trial date as determined by the
court, the court may require the tenant to deposit with the clerk of the
court such rental payments as accrue during the pendency of the suit.
(2) Trial of the action for possession shall be held not less than
ten nor more than fourteen days after the issuance of the summons. The
action shall be tried by the court without a jury. If the plaintiff
serves the summons in the manner provided in section 76-1442.01, the
action shall proceed as other actions for possession except that a money
judgment shall not be granted for the plaintiff.
(3) If judgment is rendered against the defendant for the
restitution of the premises, the court (a) shall declare the forfeiture
of the rental agreement , and (b) shall, at the request of the plaintiff
or his or her attorney, issue a writ of restitution, directing the
constable or sheriff to restore possession of the premises to the
plaintiff on a specified date not more than ten days after issuance of
the writ of restitution. The plaintiff shall comply with the Disposition
of Personal Property Landlord and Tenant Act and subsection (5) of
section 76-1414 in the removal of personal property remaining on the
premises at the time possession of the premises is restored.
-4-

LB101 LB101
2025 2025
Sec. 6. Original sections 76-1415, 76-1442, 76-1445, and 76-1446,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and section 76-1441, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-5-